Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1314
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(1) Telecommunications includes statewide digital public
television and public radio transmissions and other telecommunications technology
distribution systems; and

(2) Educational telecommunications
means the organization and use of programs,
technologies, and devices to store, archive, retrieve, process, display, receive,
or transmit, by any means, information for the purpose of carrying out educational or other governmental entities' objectives.

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 461, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2106.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 970;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 51;

Laws 2014, LB692, § 3.